Nebraska, session 109, LB760.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB760 LB760
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-502, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-502 (1) It shall be the duty of the State Fire Marshal, under
authority of the Governor:
(a) To enforce all laws of the state relating to the suppression of
arson and investigation of the cause, origin, and circumstances of fires;
(b) To promote safety and reduce loss by fire; and
(c) To make an investigation for fire safety of the premises and
facilities of:
(i) Liquor establishments for which a license or renewal of a
license is sought, upon request of the Nebraska Liquor Control
Commission, pursuant to section 53-119.01;
(ii) Licensed foster care facilities or applicants for licenses for
foster care facilities, upon request by the Department of Health and
Human Services, pursuant to section 71-1903;
(iii) Upon request of the Department of Health and Human Services,
licensed providers of programs or applicants for licenses to provide such
programs pursuant to section 71-1913 and licensed residential child-
caring agencies or applicants for such licensure pursuant to section
71-1934. The State Fire Marshal shall report the results of the
investigation to the department within thirty days after receipt of the
request from the department;
(iv) Licensed hospitals, skilled nursing facilities, intermediate
care facilities, or other health care facilities which are licensed under
the Health Care Facility Licensure Act or applicants for licenses for
such facilities or institutions, upon request by the Department of Health
and Human Services, pursuant to section 71-441; and
(v) Mobile home parks for which a license or renewal of a license is
sought, upon request of a local government the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment, pursuant to section 81-15,291.
(2) The State Fire Marshal may enter into contracts with private
-2-

LB760 LB760
2026 2026
individuals or other agencies, boards, commissions, or governmental
bodies for the purpose of carrying out his or her duties and
responsibilities pursuant to the Arson Reporting Immunity Act, the
Nebraska Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1969, and sections 81-502 to
81-538, 81-5,132 to 81-5,146, and 81-5,151 to 81-5,157.
(3) The State Fire Marshal may delegate the authority set forth in
this section and section 81-503.01 to qualified local fire prevention
personnel. The State Fire Marshal may overrule a decision, act, or policy
of the local fire prevention personnel. Such delegation of authority may
be revoked by the State Fire Marshal for cause upon thirty days' notice
after a hearing.
(4) The State Fire Marshal, first assistant fire marshal, and
deputies shall have such other powers and perform such other duties as
are set forth in sections 81-501.01 to 81-531 and 81-5,151 to 81-5,157
and as may be conferred and imposed by law.
Sec. 2. Section 81-15,261, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,261 Sections 81-15,261 to 81-15,291 81-15,292 shall be known
and may be cited as the Environmental Safety Act.
Sec. 3. Section 81-15,262, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-15,262 The Legislature finds that:
(1) Best practices in environmental safety and protection recognize
that the regulation of water supply and disposal infrastructure are
connected;
(2) The proper design, construction, and monitoring of water and
wastewater uses is critical for the safety and sustainability of
communities in the State of Nebraska;
(3) The regulation of mobile homes, recreation camps, and swimming
pools provide fundamental environmental safety for persons who use them;
and
-3-

LB760 LB760
2026 2026
(4) Consolidating the administration of state environmental safety
programs and the environmental and water programs of the United States
Environmental Protection Agency delegated to the State of Nebraska into
the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment will better serve the
communities in the State of Nebraska. Experience with the administration
of these programs demonstrates that they are carried out most effectively
through coordinated partnerships between the state and local governments.
Sec. 4. Section 81-15,263, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-15,263 For purposes of the Environmental Safety Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment; and
(2) Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment;
and .
(3) Local government means a county, city, or village in the state.
Sec. 5. Section 81-15,265, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,265 (1) The department shall prepare, adopt , and have
available minimum sanitary and safety requirements in the form of
regulations for the design and , construction , equipment, and operation
of swimming pools and bather preparation facilities. Such regulations
requirements shall include, but not be limited to, provisions for waiver
or variance of design standards and the circumstances under which such
waiver or variance may be granted. No swimming pool shall be constructed
until plans and specifications have been approved by the department.
(2) A local government may by resolution, ordinance, or regulation
adopt minimum sanitary and safety requirements for the equipment and
operation of swimming pools and bather preparation facilities.
Sec. 6. Section 81-15,267, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,267 After January 1, 1970, swimming pools shall have
-4-

LB760 LB760
2026 2026
equipment and shall be operated so as to comply with the minimum sanitary
and safety requirements provided in section 81-15,265. After such date no
swimming pool shall operate until it has received a permit from the
department. Application for a permit to operate shall be submitted on
forms provided by the department. Swimming pools constructed prior to
January 1, 1970, which do not fully comply with the minimum sanitary and
safety requirements as regards design and construction requirements may
continue to operate may be continued in use for such period as the
department may authorize if the equipment and operation of such swimming
pool comply with the minimum sanitary and safety requirements.
Sec. 7. Section 81-15,268, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,268 (1) The local government which exercises jurisdiction over
a swimming pool may inspect such department shall make at least one
inspection every year of each swimming pool to determine that such
swimming pool complies with the minimum sanitary and safety requirements
established by the local government.
(2) The owner and operator of any swimming pool shall operate such
swimming pool in compliance with minimum sanitary and safety requirements
established by the local government which exercises jurisdiction over
such swimming pool. The owner and operator of any swimming pool shall
retain for three years submit such operation and analytical records as
may be requested at any time by the department to determine the sanitary
and safety condition of the swimming pool and shall make such records
available to the local government upon request.
(3) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
which classify swimming pools on the basis of criteria deemed appropriate
by the department. The department shall charge engineering firms,
swimming pool owners, and other appropriate parties fees established by
rules and regulations for the review of plans and specifications of a
swimming pool, the issuance of a construction license or permit, the
-5-

LB760 LB760
2026 2026
inspection of a swimming pool, and any other services rendered at a rate
which defrays no more than the actual cost of the services provided. All
fees shall be paid as a condition of annual renewal of licensure or of
continuance of licensure. Fees collected under this subsection for the
review of plans and specifications and the issuance of a construction
permit shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Engineering Plan Review Cash Fund. All other fees collected under this
subsection shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Environmental Safety Cash Fund. The department shall not charge a
municipal corporation an inspection fee for an inspection of a swimming
pool owned by such municipal corporation.
(4) The operator of any swimming pool shall maintain a certificate
of competency for swimming pools. The department shall maintain a list of
acceptable pool operator competency courses. (4) The department shall
establish and collect fees for certificates of competency for swimming
pool operators. All fees collected under this subsection shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Environmental Safety
Cash Fund.
(5) All rules and regulations adopted prior to the effective date of
this act July 1, 2021, under sections 81-15,264 to 81-15,270, as such
sections existed prior to such date, shall continue to be effective to
the extent not in conflict with the changes made by this legislative bill
Laws 2021, LB148, until amended or repealed by the department.
(6) All licenses, permits, or other forms of approval issued prior
to the effective date of this act July 1, 2021, in accordance with
sections 81-15,264 to 81-15,270, as such sections existed prior to such
date, shall remain valid as issued for purposes of the changes made by
this legislative bill Laws 2021, LB148, unless revoked or otherwise
terminated by law.
(7) Any suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or
administrative, which was lawfully commenced prior to the effective date
-6-

LB760 LB760
2026 2026
of this act July 1, 2021, under sections 81-15,264 to 81-15,270, as such
sections existed prior to such date, shall be subject to the provisions
of such sections as they existed prior to the effective date of this act
July 1, 2021.
Sec. 8. Section 81-15,270, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,270 Any owner or operator of a swimming pool failing to
maintain a certificate of competency as required by section 81-15,268 or
failing to comply with the minimum sanitary and safety requirements
established by the local government with jurisdiction over such swimming
pool any of the provisions of sections 81-15,264 to 81-15,270 shall be
subject to enforcement, penalties, or other remedies as established by
such local government. guilty of maintaining a public nuisance, and it
shall be the duty of the county attorney of the county in which such
swimming pool is located to act as provided by law for the abatement of
public nuisances.
Sec. 9. Section 81-15,273, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,273 The local government which has jurisdiction over a
recreation camp may make inspections It shall be the duty of the
department to make at least one annual inspection of such each recreation
camp. The local government duly authorized representatives of the
department shall have the right of entry and access to any such camp at
any reasonable time.
Where, upon inspection, it is found that there is failure to protect
the health and safety of the persons using the camp, or a failure to
comply with the minimum health and safety requirements established by the
local government which has jurisdiction over such recreation camp, such
local government camp regulations prescribed by the department, the
department shall give notice to the camp operator of such failure, which
notice shall set forth the reason or reasons for such failure.
-7-

LB760 LB760
2026 2026
Sec. 10. Section 81-15,274, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,274 Operation of a recreation camp (1) A permit may be
temporarily suspended by the local government which has jurisdiction over
such recreation camp department for failure to protect the health and
safety of the occupants of the camp or failure to comply with the minimum
health and safety requirements established by such local government camp
regulations prescribed by the department.
(2) A permit may be revoked at any time, after notice and
opportunity for a fair hearing held by the department, if it is found
that the camp for which the permit is issued is maintained or operated in
violation of law or of any regulations applicable to a camp or in
violation of the conditions stated in the permit. A new permit shall not
be issued until the department is satisfied that the camp will be
operated in compliance with the law and regulations.
Sec. 11. Section 81-15,275, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,275 A local government may by resolution, ordinance, or
regulation adopt minimum health and safety requirements to protect the
health and safety of persons in attendance at recreation camps. (1) The
department is authorized to and shall formulate, adopt, publish,
promulgate, and enforce such reasonable rules and regulations as it deems
necessary to enforce sections 81-15,271 to 81-15,277 and to protect the
health and welfare of persons in attendance at recreation camps.
(2) All rules and regulations adopted prior to July 1, 2021, under
sections 81-15,271 to 81-15,277, as such sections existed prior to such
date, shall continue to be effective to the extent not in conflict with
the changes made by Laws 2021, LB148, and until amended or repealed by
the department.
(3) All permits or other forms of approval issued prior to July 1,
2021, in accordance with sections 81-15,271 to 81-15,277, as such
-8-

LB760 LB760
2026 2026
sections existed prior to such date, shall remain valid as issued for
purposes of the changes made by Laws 2021, LB148, unless revoked or
otherwise terminated by law.
(4) Any suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or
administrative, which was lawfully commenced prior to July 1, 2021, under
sections 81-15,271 to 81-15,277, as such sections existed prior to such
date, shall be subject to the provisions of such sections as they existed
prior to July 1, 2021.
Sec. 12. Section 81-15,277, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,277 Any person who violates the minimum health and safety
requirements of a recreation camp which were established by the local
government which has jurisdiction over such recreation camp shall be
subject to enforcement, penalties, or other remedies as established by
such local government. shall violate any of the provisions of sections
81-15,271 to 81-15,277 or of the regulations or standards adopted and
promulgated under such sections shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.
Sec. 13. Section 81-15,288, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,288 (1) A local government may by resolution, ordinance, or
regulation adopt minimum requirements for the establishment, operation,
and maintenance of mobile home parks.
(2) A local government may (1) The department shall issue licenses
for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of mobile home parks
which are found to comply with the Uniform Standard Code for Mobile Home
Parks and such minimum requirements established by such local government.
rules, regulations, and standards as are lawfully adopted and promulgated
by the department pursuant thereto.
(2) The department shall deny, refuse renewal of, suspend, or revoke
licenses or impose a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand dollars per
day on any of the following grounds:
-9-

LB760 LB760
2026 2026
(a) Violation of any of the provisions of the code or the rules,
regulations, and standards lawfully adopted and promulgated pursuant
thereto;
(b) Permitting, aiding, or abetting the commission of any unlawful
act; or
(c) Conduct or utility or sanitation practices detrimental to the
health or safety of residents of a mobile home park.
(3) Should the department determine to deny, refuse renewal of,
suspend, or revoke a license or impose a civil penalty, it shall send to
the applicant or licensee, by either certified or registered mail, a
notice setting forth the specific reasons for the determination.
(4) The denial, refusal of renewal, suspension, revocation, or
imposition of a civil penalty shall become final thirty days after the
mailing of the notice in all cases of failure to pay the required
licensure fee if not paid by the end of such period, and in all other
instances unless the applicant or licensee, within such thirty-day
period, shall give written notice of a desire for a hearing. Thereupon
the applicant or licensee shall be given opportunity for a formal hearing
before the department and shall have the right to present evidence on his
or her own behalf.
(5) The procedure governing hearings authorized by this section
shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. On the
basis of the evidence presented, the determination involved shall be
affirmed or set aside, and a copy of such decision setting forth the
findings of facts and the specific reasons upon which it is based shall
be sent by either certified or registered mail to the applicant or
licensee. The applicant or licensee may appeal such decision, and the
appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(6) The department shall remit any collected civil penalty to the
State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section
5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
-10-

LB760 LB760
2026 2026
Sec. 14. Section 81-15,289, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,289 Any person who establishes, conducts, operates, or
maintains a mobile home park in violation of the minimum requirements of
a mobile home park established by the local government which has
jurisdiction over such mobile home park shall be subject to enforcement,
penalties, or other remedies as established by the local government.
without first obtaining a license therefor from the department as
provided in the Uniform Standard Code for Mobile Home Parks shall be
guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor, and each day such mobile home park
shall operate without a license after a first conviction shall be
considered a separate offense. Such person shall also be guilty of
maintaining a nuisance pursuant to section 28-1321, and upon conviction
thereof, in addition to payment of the fine, such nuisance shall be
removed.
Sec. 15. Section 81-15,291, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,291 A local government The department may request the State
Fire Marshal to inspect for fire safety any mobile home park which the
local government has jurisdiction over for which a license or renewal of
a license is sought, pursuant to section 81-502. The State Fire Marshal
shall assess a fee for such inspection pursuant to section 81-505.01 and
payable by the licensee or applicant for a license. The authority to make
such investigations may be delegated to qualified local fire prevention
personnel pursuant to section 81-502.
Sec. 16. Section 81-15,300, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-15,300 There is hereby created the Engineering Plan Review Cash
Fund which shall be used to pay the expenses of the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment related to engineering reviews of plans and
specifications, including those under subsection (2) (3) of section
-11-

LB760 LB760
2026 2026
81-15,268 and subsection (2) of section 81-15,282. Transfers may be made
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
Any money in the Engineering Plan Review Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 17. Original sections 81-15,261, 81-15,265, 81-15,267,
81-15,268, 81-15,270, 81-15,273, 81-15,274, 81-15,275, 81-15,277,
81-15,288, 81-15,289, and 81-15,291, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 81-502, 81-15,262, 81-15,263, and 81-15,300,
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 18. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
81-15,266, 81-15,269, 81-15,272, 81-15,276, 81-15,280, 81-15,281,
81-15,282, 81-15,283, 81-15,284, 81-15,285, 81-15,286, 81-15,287, and
81-15,290, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 81-15,292
and 81-15,299, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025.
-12-